Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201621-20,141
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Dissenters' rights; notice of intent to demand payment.

(1) If proposed corporate action creating dissenters' rights under section 21-20,138 is submitted to a vote at a shareholders' meeting, a shareholder who wishes to assert dissenters' rights (a) shall deliver to the corporation before the vote is taken written notice of his or her intent to demand payment for his or her shares if the proposed action is effectuated and (b) shall not vote his or her shares in favor of the proposed action.

(2) A shareholder who does not satisfy the requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall not be entitled to payment for his or her shares under sections 21-20,137 to 21-20,150.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 141.